Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE K. CERTAIN BENEFITS AND ARRANGEMENTS THAT ARE NOT INSURANCE

CHAPTER 1681. HEALTH CARE SHARING MINISTRIES

Sec. 1681.001. TREATMENT AS HEALTH CARE SHARING MINISTRY. A faith-based, nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 qualifies for treatment as a health care sharing ministry under this chapter if it:

(1) limits its participants to individuals of a similar faith;

(2) acts as a facilitator among participants who have medical bills and matches those participants with other participants with the present ability to assist those with medical bills in accordance with criteria established by the health care sharing ministry;

(3) provides for the medical bills of a participant through contributions from one participant to another;

(4) provides amounts that participants may contribute with no assumption of risk or promise to pay among the participants and no assumption of risk or promise to pay by the health care sharing ministry to the participants;

(5) provides a written monthly statement to all participants that lists the total dollar amount of qualified needs submitted to the health care sharing ministry, as well as the amount actually published or assigned to participants for their contribution;

(6) discloses administrative fees and costs to participants;

(7) provides that any card issued to a participant for the purpose of presentation to a health care provider clearly indicates that the participant is part of a health care sharing ministry that is not engaging in the business of insurance;

(8) provides a written disclaimer on or accompanying all applications and guideline materials distributed by or on behalf of the ministry that complies with Section 1681.002; and

(9) does not operate a discount health care program as defined by Section 7001.001.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 455 (S.B. 874), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1681.002. NOTICE. To qualify as a health care sharing ministry under this chapter, the notice described by Section 1681.001(8) must read substantially as follows:

"Notice: This health care sharing ministry facilitates the sharing of medical expenses and is not an insurance company, and neither its guidelines nor its plan of operation is an insurance policy. Whether anyone chooses to assist you with your medical bills will be totally voluntary because no other participant will be compelled by law to contribute toward your medical bills. As such, participation in the ministry or a subscription to any of its documents should never be considered to be insurance. Regardless of whether you receive any payment for medical expenses or whether this ministry continues to operate, you are always personally responsible for the payment of your own medical bills. Complaints concerning this health care sharing ministry may be reported to the office of the Texas attorney general."

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 455 (S.B. 874), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1681.003. EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a health care sharing ministry that acts in accordance with this chapter is not considered to be engaging in the business of insurance.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 455 (S.B. 874), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.